fst/diq.twol
Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ş ı ğ û ê
A B C D E F G H İ J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ş I Ğ Û Ê 
%>:0 %{Y%}:0 %{Y%}:y
%{ê%}:ê %{ê%}:y ;

Sets

Vowel = a e o i ı û ê u;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"i to y after vowel"
i:y <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;

"ê to y after vowel"
%{ê%}:y <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;

"ê to y after vowel"
%{Y%}:y <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;
